North Carolina, session 2025, HB844.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. ADOPTION LAW CHANGES
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 7B-100 reads as rewritten:
"Chapter 7B.
"Juvenile Code.
"SUBCHAPTER I. ABUSE, NEGLECT, DEPENDENCY.
"Article 1.
"Purposes; Definitions.
"§ 7B-100. Purpose.
This Subchapter shall be interpreted and construed so as to implement the following purposes
and policies:
(1) To provide procedures for the hearing of juvenile cases that assure fairness
and equity and that protect the constitutional rights of juveniles and parents;
(2) To develop a disposition in each juvenile case that reflects consideration of
the facts, the needs and limitations of the juvenile, and the strengths and
weaknesses of the family.
(3) To provide for services for the protection of juveniles by means that respect
both the right to family autonomy and the juveniles' needs for safety,
continuity, and permanence; and
(4) To provide standards for the removal, when necessary, of juveniles from their
homes and for the return of juveniles to their homes consistent with preventing
the unnecessary or inappropriate separation of juveniles from their parents.
(5) To provide standards, consistent with the Adoption and Safe Families Act of
1997, P.L. 105-89, for ensuring that the best interests of the juvenile are of
paramount consideration by the court and that when it is not in the juvenile's
best interest to be returned home, the juvenile will be placed in a safe,
permanent home within a reasonable amount of time.two years."
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 7B-1111 reads as rewritten:
"§ 7B-1111. Grounds for terminating parental rights.
(a) The court may terminate the parental rights upon a finding of one or more of the
following:
…
*H844-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(7) The parent has willfully abandoned the juvenile for at least six consecutive
cumulative months immediately preceding the filing of the petition or motion,
or the parent has voluntarily abandoned an infant as a safely surrendered infant
pursuant to Article 5A of this Subchapter for at least 60 consecutive days
immediately preceding the filing of the petition or motion.
…."
SECTION 1.3. G.S. 48-1-110 reads as rewritten:
"§ 48-1-110. Support Adoption information; support for adoptive families at risk of
dissolution.
(a) The Department of Health and Human Services shall provide information on its
website addressing all of the following:
(1) Benefits of adoption and the adoption process in North Carolina.
(2) Adoption agencies in North Carolina and related services.
(3) Causes of disruption of adoptive placement or dissolution of adoption and
resources available to avoid disruption or dissolution.
(4) Services to assist women during and after pregnancy and childbirth.
(5) Abortion alternatives and related services.
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services shall develop a program to provide
needed supports to families at risk of adoption dissolutions in order to keep families together."
SECTION 1.4. G.S. 48-2-206 reads as rewritten:
"§ 48-2-206. Prebirth determination of right to consent.
(a) At any time after approximately three months from the date of conception as
reasonably determined by a physician, the biological mother, agency, or adoptive parents chosen
by the biological mother may file a special proceeding with the clerk requesting the court to
determine whether consent of the biological father is required. The biological father shall be
served with notice of the intent of the biological mother to place the child for adoption, allowing
the biological father 30 days after service to assert a claim that his consent is required.
…."
SECTION 1.5. G.S. 48-2-607 reads as rewritten:
"§ 48-2-607. Appeals.
(a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c) of this section, after the final order of
adoption is entered, no party to an adoption proceeding nor anyone claiming under such a party
may question the validity of the adoption because of any defect or irregularity, jurisdictional or
otherwise, in the proceeding, but shall be fully bound by the order. No adoption may be attacked
either directly or collaterally because of any procedural or other defect by anyone who was not a
party to the adoption. The failure on the part of the court or an agency to perform duties or acts
within the time required by the provisions of this Chapter shall not affect the validity of any
adoption proceeding.
(b) A party to an adoption proceeding may appeal a final decree of adoption entered by a
clerk of superior court to district court by giving notice of appeal as provided in G.S. 1-301.2. A
party to an adoption proceeding may appeal a judgment or order entered by a judge of district
court by giving notice of appeal as provided in G.S. 1-279.1.
(c) A parent or guardian whose consent or relinquishment was obtained by fraud or
duress may, within six months of the time the fraud or duress is or ought reasonably to have been
discovered, move to have the decree of adoption set aside and the consent declared void. A parent
or guardian whose consent was necessary under this Chapter but was not obtained may, within
six months of the time the omission is or ought reasonably to have been discovered, move to
have the decree of adoption set aside. Any action for damages against an adoptee or the adoptive
parents for fraud or duress in obtaining a consent must be brought within six months of the time
the fraud or duress is or ought reasonably to have been discovered."
SECTION 1.6. G.S. 115C-81.30 reads as rewritten:
Page 2 House Bill 844-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"§ 115C-81.30. Reproductive health and safety education provided by local school
administrative units.
(a) Each local school administrative unit shall provide a reproductive health and safety
education program commencing in the seventh grade. Materials used in this instruction shall be
age-appropriate for use with students. Law enforcement agencies, criminal justice agencies, and
nongovernmental organizations with experience in sex-trafficking prevention and awareness may
provide materials and information. Information conveyed during the instruction shall be
objective and based upon scientific research that is peer reviewed and accepted by professionals
and credentialed experts in any of the following fields: sexual health education, adolescent
psychology, behavioral counseling, medicine, human anatomy, biology, ethics, or health
education. Reproductive health and safety instruction provided by the local school administrative
units shall do the following:
…
(14) Provide information about adoption, the benefits of adoption, and where
additional information can be found about adoption.
…."

PART II. ABORTION LAW REVISIONS
SECTION 2.1. G.S. 90-21.81A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.81A. Abortion.
(a) Abortion. – It shall be unlawful after the twelfth sixth week of a woman's pregnancy
to procure or cause a miscarriage or abortion in the State of North Carolina.
(b) Partial-Birth Abortion Prohibited. – It shall be unlawful for a qualified physician, any
health care provider, or any person to perform a partial-birth abortion at any time."
SECTION 2.2. G.S. 90-21.81B reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.81B. When abortion is lawful.
Notwithstanding any of the provisions of G.S. 14-44 and G.S. 14-45, and subject to the
provisions of this Article, it shall not be unlawful to procure or cause a miscarriage or an abortion
in the State of North Carolina in the following circumstances:
(1) When a qualified physician determines there exists a medical emergency.
(2) During the first 12 six weeks of a woman's pregnancy, when the procedure is
performed by a qualified physician licensed to practice medicine in this State
in a hospital, ambulatory surgical center, or clinic certified by the Department
of Health and Human Services to be a suitable facility for the performance of
abortions, in accordance with G.S. 90-21.82A or during the first 12 six weeks
of a woman's pregnancy when a medical abortion is procured.
(3) After the twelfth week and through the twentieth week of a woman's
pregnancy, when the procedure is performed by a qualified physician in a
suitable facility in accordance with G.S. 90-21.82A when the woman's
pregnancy is a result of rape or incest.
(4) During the first 24 weeks of a woman's pregnancy, if a qualified physician
determines there exists a life-limiting anomaly in accordance with this
Article."
SECTION 2.3. G.S. 90-21.81C reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.81C. Abortion reporting, objection, and inspection requirements.
(a) Procedure Information. – A qualified physician who advises, procures, or causes a
miscarriage or abortion after the twelfth sixth week of a woman's pregnancy shall record all of
the following: (i) the method used by the qualified physician to determine the probable
gestational age of the unborn child at the time the procedure is to be performed, (ii) the results of
the methodology, including the measurements of the unborn child, and (iii) an ultrasound image
of the unborn child that depicts the measurements. The qualified physician shall provide this
House Bill 844-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
information, including the ultrasound image, to the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to subsection (c) of this section.
(b) Recording of Findings. – A qualified physician who procures or causes a miscarriage
or abortion after the twelfth sixth week of a woman's pregnancy shall record the findings and
analysis on which the qualified physician based the determination that there existed a medical
emergency, life-limiting anomaly, rape, or incest and shall provide that information to the
Department of Health and Human Services pursuant to subsection (c) of this section. Materials
generated by the physician or provided by the physician to the Department of Health and Human
Services pursuant to this section shall not be public records under G.S. 132-1. The information
provided under this subsection shall be for statistical purposes only, and the confidentiality of the
patient and the physician shall be protected. It is the duty of the qualified physician to submit
information to the Department of Health and Human Services that omits identifying information
of the patient and complies with Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996
(HIPAA).
…."
SECTION 2.4. G.S. 90-21.82A reads as rewritten:
"§ 90-21.82A. Suitable facilities for the performance of surgical abortions.
…
(b) During the first 12 six weeks of pregnancy, a physician licensed to practice medicine
under this Chapter may perform a surgical abortion in a hospital, an ambulatory surgical facility,
or an abortion clinic; provided, however, that (i) the clinic has been licensed by the Department
of Health and Human Services to be a suitable facility for the performance of abortions and (ii)
the licensed physician performs the abortion in accordance with this Article and Article 1K of
this Chapter.
(c) After the twelfth sixth week of pregnancy, a physician licensed to practice medicine
under this Chapter may not perform a surgical abortion or dispense abortion-inducing drugs as
permitted under North Carolina law in any facility other than a hospital."

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law, with:
(1) Sections 1.1, 1.3, 1.4, and 1.5 of this act becoming effective October 1, 2025.
(2) Section 1.2 of this act becoming effective October 1, 2025, and applying to
petitions on or after that date.
(3) Section 1.6 of this act becoming effective at the beginning of the 2026-2027
school year.
Page 4 House Bill 844-First Edition